src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51kahdeksaskymmenes

+Ord+Pl+Abe:ittakymmenittä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:ansiltakymmeniltä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:ansillakymmenillä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:ansillekymmenille  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:inekymmenine  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:ansistakymmenistä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:inakymmeninä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:ienkymmenien  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:iinkymmeniin  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:ansissakymmenissä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:inkymmenin  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:atkymmenet  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:iakymmeniä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:iksikymmeniksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:attakymmenettä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:anneltakymmeneltä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:annellakymmenellä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:annellekymmenelle  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:astakymmenestä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:anakymmenenä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:ankymmenen  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:anteenkymmeneen  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:assakymmenessä  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:askymmenes  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:attakymmenes  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:aksikymmeneksi  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdeksasmiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:ittamiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:ansiltamiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:ansillamiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:ansillemiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:inemiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:ansistamiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:inamiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:ienmiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:iinmiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:ansissamiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:inmiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:atmiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:iamiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:iksimiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:attamiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:anneltamiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:annellamiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:annellemiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:astamiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:anamiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:anmiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:anteenmiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:assamiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:asmiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:attamiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:aksimiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdeksasmiljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:ittamiljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:ansiltamiljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:ansillamiljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:ansillemiljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:inemiljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:ansistamiljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:inamiljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:ienmiljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:iinmiljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:ansissamiljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:inmiljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:atmiljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:iamiljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:iksimiljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:attamiljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:anneltamiljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:annellamiljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:annellemiljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:astamiljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:anamiljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:anmiljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:anteenmiljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:assamiljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:asmiljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:attamiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:aksimiljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdeksasneljästtä

+Ord+Pl+Abe:ittaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:ansiltäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:ansilläneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:ansilleneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:ineneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:ansistäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:inaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:ienneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:iinneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:ansissäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:atneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:ianeljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:iksineljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:attaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:anneltäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:annelläneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:annelleneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:astaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ananeljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:anneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:aanneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:assaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:asneljästtä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:aaneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:aksineljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdeksasnoniljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:ittanoniljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:ansiltanoniljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:ansillanoniljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:ansillenoniljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:inenoniljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:ansistanoniljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:inanoniljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:iennoniljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:iinnoniljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:ansissanoniljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:innoniljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:atnoniljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:ianoniljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:iksinoniljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:anteenoniljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:anneltanoniljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:annellanoniljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:annellenoniljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:astanoniljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ananoniljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:annoniljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:anteennoniljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:assanoniljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:asnoniljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:anteenoniljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:aksinoniljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kahdeksaskymmenes+Num:kahdeks  NUM_51kahdeksaskymmenes  ;
kahdeksasmiljardis+Num:kahdeks  NUM_51kahdeksasmiljardis  ;
kahdeksasmiljoonas+Num:kahdeks  NUM_51kahdeksasmiljoonas  ;
kahdeksasneljästtä+Num:kahdeks  NUM_51kahdeksasneljästtä  ;
kahdeksasnoniljardis+Num:kahdeks  NUM_51kahdeksasnoniljardis  ;
